src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection

Erzya language verbs inflect for person, subject and object.








OBJECT FLAGS AND +V+TV tags
а+V:а 




**LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1 ** а+V:эзь




**LEXICON TV_KADOMS ** 




**LEXICON TV_NEVTEMS_SUB ** 

* _LEXICON TV_NEVTEMS_  невтемс:невть

**LEXICON TV_SAVTOMS_SUB ** 

**LEXICON TV_SAVTOMS ** 

**LEXICON TV_SAVTOMS-SG3_SUBJ/ZERO ** 

**LEXICON TV_CHACHTOMS ** 


**LEXICON TV_KUNDAMS_SUB ** 

**LEXICON TV_KUNDAMS ** 





**LEXICON TV_SATOMS ** 



**LEXICON TV_TUEMS ** 

**LEXICON TV_TEEMS ** 



* _LEXICON TV_NEKSHNEMS_  некшнемс:некшн


VERBS WITH THIRD PERSON OBJECTS @U.CONJ-PX.13@





































VERBS WITH INTRANSITIVE TAGS +V+IV


























# AUXILIARY VERBS







# DERIVATION






# VERBS AFTER TRANSITIVITY Tags OBJECT FLAGS 




теемс:тей
теемс:тей























no deverbals




no deverbals
















no deverbals













## DERIVATION 


















**LEXICON TV_NEKSHNEMS** Alternates with TRA
**LEXICON TV_NEKSHNEMS** Alternates with TRA



This is fed by actors and participles in N_myv, A_myv and Prc_myv
This is fed by actors and participles in N_myv, A_myv and Prc_myv







## CONJUGATION 

















Indicative Preterite I
















## INDICATIVE 

Indicative NonPast 









































































## INDICATIVE PRETERITE 2 





































## DESIDERATIVE 

















































## CONJUNCTIVE 

redo conj 2012-11-07 begin




































































redo conj 2012-11-07 end






begin







































end





## OPTATIVE 













## IMPERATIVE 














## PRECATIVE















## OPTATIVE 


2012-11-09











































Given in Grammar 2000




















Used with deverbals






























ваномс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+Clt/Ga: **look/katsoa**
* *ван%>%{оеэØ%}дО1%>Г4а*
* *ван%>одо%>0я*








* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
